Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-679
Car line company, defined.

For purposes of sections 77-680 to 77-691, car line company shall mean any person, other than a person operating a railroad, owning or operating any railroad cars through, in, or into the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 205.